Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202016-327
Officers; reports required.

The mayor or city council of a city of the first class shall have power, when he, she, or it deems it necessary, to require any officer of the city to exhibit his or her accounts or other papers and make reports to the city council, in writing, touching any subject or matter it may require pertaining to the office.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 33, p. 239;

R.S.1913, § 4893;

C.S.1922, § 4061;

C.S.1929, § 16-323;

R.S.1943, § 16-327;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 27;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 69;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 21.